zh-TW: 賽車手套認證標準: CE 認證 (未指定); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; 未認證; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; 其他
de: Zertifizierungsstandard der Rennhandschuhe: CE-zertifiziert (nicht spezifiziert); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Nicht zertifiziert; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Sonstige
es: Estándar de certificación de guantes de carreras: Certificación CE (sin especificar); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Sin certificación; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Otra
ja: レースグローブ認証標準: CE認定 (未指定); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; 認定なし; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; その他
sk-SK: Norma na certifikáciu pretekárskych rukavíc: Certifikácia CE (nešpecifikované); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Bez certifikácie; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Iné
el: Πρότυπο πιστοποίησης αγωνιστικών γαντιών: Πιστοποίηση CE (μη καθορισμένο); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Χωρίς πιστοποίηση; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Άλλο
lt-LT: Lenktynių pirštinių sertifikavimo standartas: Sertifikuota CE (nenurodyta); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Nesertifikuota; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Kita
da: Certificeringsstandard for racerhandske: CE-certificeret (uspecificeret); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Ikke certificeret; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Andet
nb: Sertifiseringsstandard for racinghanske: CE-sertifisert (uspesifisert); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Ikke sertifisert; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Annet
hu: Versenykesztyű tanúsítási szabványa: CE-tanúsítvánnyal (nem specifikált); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Nem tanúsított; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Egyéb
ko: 레이싱 장갑 인증 표준: CE 인증(미지정); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; 미인증; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; 기타
sl-SI: Certifikacijski standard za dirkaške rokavice: Certifikat CE (nedoločeno); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Brez certifikata; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Drugo
ro-RO: Standard de certificare pentru mănuși de curse: Certificare CE (nespecificat); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Necertificat; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Altele
zh-CN: 赛车手套认证标准: CE 认证（未指定）; EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; 未认证; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; 其他
tr: Yarış eldiveni sertifikasyon standardı: CE sertifikalı (belirtilmemiş); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Sertifikasız; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Diğer
pt-PT: Norma de certificação das luvas de corrida: Certificação CE (não especificado); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Sem certificação; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Outra
fr: Norme de certification des gants de course: Certifié CE (non spécifié); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Non certifié; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Autre
cs: Certifikační standard závodních rukavic: Certifikace CE (nespecifikováno); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Bez certifikace; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Jiné
hr-HR: Standard certificiranja trkaćih rukavica: CE certifikat (nespecificirano); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Nema certifikat; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Ostalo
fi: Kilpakäsineen sertifiointistandardi: CE-sertifioitu (määrittelemätön); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Ei sertifioitu; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Muu
pl: Norma certyfikacji rękawic wyścigowych: Certyfikat CE (nieokreślony); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Brak certyfikatu; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Inne
bg-BG: Стандарт за сертификация на състезателни ръкавици: CE сертификат (неуточнено); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Не е сертифициран; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Друго
vi: Tiêu chuẩn chứng nhận của găng tay đua xe: Chứng nhận CE (không xác định); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Không được chứng nhận; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Khác
ru: Стандарт сертификации гоночных перчаток: Сертификат CE (не указан); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Без сертификации; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Другое
nl: Certificeringsnorm racehandschoenen: CE-gecertificeerd (ongespecificeerd); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Niet gecertificeerd; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Overig
th: มาตรฐานการรับรองถุงมือแข่งรถ: ได้รับการรับรองมาตรฐาน CE (ไม่ระบุ); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; ไม่ได้รับการรับรอง; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; อื่นๆ
it: Standard di certificazione del guanto da corsa: Certificazione CE (non specificata); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Non certificato; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Altro
pt-BR: Luva de competição, norma de homologação: Certificação CE (não especificada); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Sem certificação; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Outra
en: Racing glove certification standard: CE certified (unspecified); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Not certified; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Other
sv: Certifieringsstandard för racinghandske: CE-certifierad (ospecificerad); EN 13594; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Ej certifierad; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/5; Övrigt